Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-404
Office of Juvenile Services; created; powers and duties.

There is created within the Department of Health and Human Services the Office of Juvenile Services. The office shall have oversight and control of the youth rehabilitation and treatment centers. The Administrator of the Office of Juvenile Services shall be appointed by the chief executive officer of the department or his or her designee and shall be responsible for the administration of the facilities and programs of the office. The department may subcontract with a state agency or private provider to provide services related to the facilities and programs of the Office of Juvenile Services.

Laws 1994, LB 988, § 10;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 960;

R.S.Supp.,1996, § 83-925.02;

Laws 1998, LB 1073, § 36;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 109;

Laws 2013, LB561, § 26;

Laws 2020, LB1188, § 3.